Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 26 Hemp Growth Act

2-26-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Industrial Hemp Growth Act.”

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.

2-26-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares as follows:

The cannabis sativa plant used for the production of hemp is separate and distinct from forms of cannabis used to produce marijuana.

Hemp is used for products such as building materials, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, floor coverings, fuel, industrial chemicals, paint, paper, particle board, plastics, seed meal, seed oil, and yarn.

Industrial hemp production has remained legal throughout most of the world and hemp has the capacity to grow in a multitude of different climates, altitudes, soils, and weather conditions.

Currently, it is legal to import industrial hemp into the United States.

Although federal law currently prohibits the cultivation of hemp, the laws of California, Colorado, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Montana, North Dakota, Oregon, South Carolina, Tennessee, Vermont, Virginia and West Virginia permit commercial hemp programs.

Currently, the United States is the largest importer of hemp products, the largest portion of which is imported from China.

States are not required to enforce federal law or prosecute people for engaging in activities prohibited by federal law. Therefore, compliance with this chapter does not put the state of Rhode Island in violation of federal law.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1.

2-26-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Applicant” means any person, firm, corporation, or other legal entity who or that, on his, her, or its own behalf, or on behalf of another, has applied for permission to engage in any act or activity that is regulated under the provisions of this chapter.

“Cannabis” means all parts of the plant of the genus marijuana, also known as marijuana sativa L. whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin regardless of cannabinoid content or cannabinoid potency including “marijuana” and “industrial hemp” or “industrial hemp products” which satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

“Cannabidiol” or “CBD” means cannabidiol (CBD) derived from a hemp plant as defined in §

2-26-3

, not including products derived from exempt cannabis plant material as defined in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.35.

“Department” means the office of cannabis regulation within the department of business regulation.

“Division” means the division of agriculture in the department of environmental management.

“Grower” means a person or entity who or that produces hemp for commercial purposes.

“Handler” means a person or entity who or that produces or processes hemp or agricultural hemp seed into commodities or who manufactures hemp products.

“Hemp” or “industrial hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight or per volume basis regardless of moisture content, and which satisfies the requirements of this chapter.

“Hemp-derived consumable CBD product” means any product meant for ingestion, including, but not limited to, concentrates, extracts, and cannabis-infused foods and products, which contains cannabidiol derived from a hemp plant as defined in this section,
which shall only be sold to persons age twenty-one (21) or older, and which shall not include products derived from exempt cannabis plant material as defined in 21 C.F.R. § 1308.35.

“Hemp products” or “industrial hemp products” means all products made from the plants, including, but not limited to, concentrated oil, cloth, cordage, fiber, food, fuel, hemp-derived consumable CBD products, paint, paper, construction materials, plastics,
seed, seed meal, seed oil, and seed certified for cultivation, which satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

“Licensed CBD distributor” means a person licensed to distribute hemp-derived consumable CBD products pursuant to this chapter.

“Licensed CBD retailer” means a person licensed to sell hemp-derived consumable CBD products pursuant to this chapter.

“THC” means tetrahydrocannabinol, the principal psychoactive constituent of cannabis.

“THCA” means tetrahydrocannabinol acid.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.

2-26-4.
Hemp an agricultural product.

Hemp is an agricultural product that may be grown as a crop, produced, possessed, distributed, sold at retail, and commercially traded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Hemp is subject to primary regulation by the department. The division may
assist the department in the regulation of hemp growth and production.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.

2-26-5.
Authority over licensing and sales.

The department shall prescribe rules and regulations for the licensing and regulation of hemp growers, handlers, licensed CBD distributors, and licensed CBD retailers and persons employed by the applicant not inconsistent with law, to carry into effect
the provision of this chapter and shall be responsible for the enforcement of the licensing.

All growers, handlers, licensed CBD distributors, and licensed CBD retailers must have a hemp license issued by the department. All production, distribution, and retail sale of hemp-derived consumable CBD products must be consistent with any applicable
state or local food processing and safety regulations, and the applicant shall be responsible to ensure its compliance with the regulations and any applicable food safety licensing requirements, including, but not limited to, those
promulgated by the department of health.

The application for a hemp license shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The name and address of the applicant who will supervise, manage, or direct the growing and handling of hemp and the names and addresses of any person or entity partnering or providing consulting services regarding the growing or handling of hemp; and

The name and address of the applicant who will supervise, manage, or direct the distribution or sale of hemp-derived consumable CBD products, and names and addresses of any person or entity partnering or providing consulting services regarding the distribution
or sale of hemp-derived CBD products.

A certificate of analysis that the seeds or plants obtained for cultivation are of a type and variety that do not exceed the maximum concentration of delta-9 THC, as set forth in §

2-26-3

; any seeds that are obtained from a federal agency are presumed not to exceed the maximum concentration and do not require a certificate of analysis.

The location of the facility, including the Global Positioning System location, and other field reference information as may be required by the department with a tracking program and security layout to ensure that all hemp grown is tracked and monitored
from seed to distribution outlets; and

The location of the facility and other information as may be required by the department as to where the distribution or sale of hemp-derived consumable CBD products will occur.

An explanation of the seed-to-sale tracking, cultivation method, extraction method, and certificate of analysis or certificate of analysis for the standard hemp seeds or hemp product if required by the department.

Verification, prior to planting any seed, that the plant to be grown is of a type and variety of hemp that will produce a delta-9 THC concentration of no more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry-weight basis.

Documentation that the licensee and/or its agents have entered into a purchase agreement with a hemp handler, processor, distributor, or retailer.

All applicants:

Shall apply to the state police, attorney general, or local law enforcement for a National Criminal Identification records check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Upon the discovery of a disqualifying conviction
defined in subsections (c)(7)(iv) and (c)(7)(v), and in accordance with the rules promulgated by the department, the state police shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the conviction, and the
state police shall notify the department, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the conviction, that a conviction has been found;

In those situations in which no conviction has been found, the state police shall inform the applicant and the department, in writing, of this fact;

All applicants shall be responsible for any expense associated with the criminal background check with fingerprints.

Any applicant who has been convicted of any felony offense under chapter 28 of title 21, or any person who has been convicted of murder; manslaughter; first-degree sexual assault; second-degree sexual assault; first-degree child molestation; second-degree
child molestation; kidnapping; first-degree arson; second-degree arson; mayhem; robbery; burglary; breaking and entering; assault with a dangerous weapon; or any assault and battery punishable as a felony or assault
with intent to commit any offense punishable as a felony, shall be disqualified from holding any license or permit under this chapter. The department shall notify any applicant, in writing, of a denial of a license
pursuant to this subsection.

For purposes of this section, “conviction” means, in addition to judgments of conviction entered by a court subsequent to a finding of guilty, or plea of guilty, those instances where the defendant has entered a plea of nolo contendere and has received
a jail sentence or a suspended jail sentence, or those instances wherein the defendant has entered into a deferred sentence agreement with the Rhode Island attorney general and the period of deferment has not been
completed.

Any other information as set forth in rules and regulations as required by the department.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.]

The department shall issue a hemp license to the grower or handler applicant if he, she, or it meets the requirements of this chapter, upon the applicant paying a licensure fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The license shall be renewed
every two (2) years upon payment of a two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500) renewal fee. Any licensee convicted of any disqualifying offense described in subsection (c)(7)(iv) shall have his, her, or its license revoked. All
license fees shall be directed to the department to help defray the cost of enforcement. The department shall collect a nonrefundable application fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each application to obtain a license.

Any grower or handler license applicant or license holder may also apply for and be issued one (1) CBD distributor and/or one (1) CBD retailer license at no additional cost, provided their grower or handler license is issued or renewed. CBD distributor
and CBD retailer licenses shall be renewed each year at no additional fee provided the applicant also holds or renews a grower and/or handler license.

For applicants who do not hold, renew, or receive a grower or handler license, CBD distributor and CBD retailer licenses shall have a licensure fee of five hundred dollars ($500). The licenses shall be renewed each year upon approval by the department
and payment of a five hundred dollar ($500) renewal fee.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.

2-26-6.
Rulemaking authority.

The department shall adopt rules to provide for the implementation of this chapter, which shall include rules to require hemp to be tested during growth for THC levels and to require inspection of hemp during sowing, growing season, harvest, storage,
and processing. Included in these rules should be a system requiring the licensee to submit crop samples to an approved testing facility, as determined by the department for testing and verification of compliance with the limits
on delta-9 THC concentration.

The department shall prescribe rules and regulations for all operational requirements for licensed growers, handlers, CBD distributors, and retailers, and to ensure consistency in manufactured products and appropriate packaging, labeling, and placement
with respect to retail sales not inconsistent with law, to carry in effect the provisions of this chapter.

The department shall not adopt, under this or any other section, a rule that would prohibit a person or entity to grow, distribute, or sell hemp based solely on the legal status of hemp under federal law.

The department may adopt rules and regulations based on federal law provided those rules and regulations are designed to comply with federal guidance and mitigate federal enforcement against the licenses issued under this chapter.

[Deleted by P.L. 2020, ch. 1, § 2 and P.L. 2020, ch. 2, § 2.]

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 1, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 2, § 2.

2-26-7.
Licensure.

Except as provided in this section, beginning sixty (60) days after the effective date of this chapter, the department shall accept the application for licensure to cultivate hemp submitted by the applicant.

A person or entity, licensed by the department pursuant to this chapter, shall allow hemp crops, throughout sowing, year-long growing seasons, harvest storage, and processing, manufacturing, and retail facilities to be inspected and tested by and at the
discretion of the department and as required pursuant to any applicable state or local food processing and safety regulations, including, but not limited to those, promulgated by the Rhode Island department of health.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 1.

2-26-8.
Methods of extraction.

The department shall adopt rules regarding permissible methods of extraction.

No butane method of extraction shall be permitted by the department.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1.

2-26-9.
Research and educational growth by institutions of higher education.

The department is authorized to certify any higher educational institution in Rhode Island to grow or handle, or assist in growing or handling, industrial hemp for the purpose of agricultural or academic research where such higher educational institution
submits the following to the department:

The location where the higher educational institution intends to grow or cultivate the industrial hemp;

The higher educational institution’s research plan; and

The name of the employee of the higher educational institution who will supervise the hemp growth, cultivation, and research.

Growth for purposes of agricultural and educational research by a higher educational institution shall not be subject to the licensing requirements set forth in §

2-26-5

.

The applicant is encouraged to partner with an institution of higher learning within the state of Rhode Island to develop best practices for growing and handling hemp.

The department shall maintain a list of each higher education institution certified to grow or cultivate industrial hemp under this chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 2016, ch. 441, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 442, § 1.

2-26-10.
Enforcement of violations of chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the director of the department, or his or her designee, has cause to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulations promulgated hereunder has occurred by a licensee
who or that is under the department’s jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, or that any person or entity is conducting any activities requiring licensure by the department under this chapter or the regulations promulgated hereunder
without such licensure, the director, or his or her designee, may, in accordance with the requirements of the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42:

Revoke or suspend a license;

Levy an administrative penalty in an amount established pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department;

Order the violator to cease and desist such actions;

Require a licensee or person or entity conducting any activities requiring licensure under this chapter to take such actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter and the regulations promulgated thereunder; or

Any combination of the above penalties.

If the director of the department finds that public health, safety, or welfare requires emergency action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in his or her order, summary suspension of license and/or cease and desist may be ordered pending proceedings
for revocation or other action.

History of Section.
P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 15, § 2.